Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.330

Penalty for injury to property.

Whoever intentionally injures, defaces, or destroys any property belonging to or deposited in any public library, reading room, or other educational institution, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1935 c 119 s 16; RRS s 8226-16. Prior: 1909 c 116 s 11; 1901 c 166 s 11.]